Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-829
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(1) Ninety-five percent of counties in Nebraska are classified as behavioral health profession shortage areas by the federal Health Resources and Services Administration and the Nebraska Department of Health and Human Services;

(2) There are severe behavioral health workforce shortages in rural and underserved areas of the state which negatively impact access to appropriate behavioral health services for Nebraska residents; and

(3) Nebraska must act to address immediate needs and implement long-term strategies to alleviate education, recruitment, and retention challenges in the behavioral health field.

Laws 2009, LB603, § 13;

Laws 2022, LB1068, § 1.